Illinois, session 104th, SB3988.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5adding Section 5-8-1.4 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-8-1.4 new)7    Sec. 5-8-1.4. Drug screening. The Department shall require 8drug screening of every offender committed to a Department 9facility and may provide appropriate drug treatment services 10to certain offenders based on the results of the initial 11screening. The Department shall adopt rules to implement this 12Section.